District of Columbia statutes.
25-371

Moratorium on establishments which permit nude dancing.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no licensee under this title shall permit nude dancers.

(b)

A licensee who regularly provided entertainment by nude dancers before December 15, 1993, may continue to do so at its establishment.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 319, ch. 4, § 3
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 897, ch. 756, § 1
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 1
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 2, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-204, § 2, 30 DCR 185
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-16, § 2, 30 DCR 3193
May 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-119, § 2, 33 DCR 2447
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 2, 34 DCR 907
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-40, § 2(a), 38 DCR 4974
Oct. 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-174, § 2(a), 39 DCR 5859
Sept. 11, 1993, D.C. Law 10-12, § 2(a), 40 DCR 4020
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122,§ 2(a), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-258, § 2(a), 44 DCR 1421
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-202,§ 2(a), 45 DCR 8412
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-206, § 2(a), 45 DCR 8430
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Oct. 26, 2001, D.C. Law 14-42, § 6(c), 48 DCR 7612

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-372, § 25-373, and § 25-374.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-103.
1973 Ed., § 25-103.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-42, in subsec. (a), substituted “shall” for “may”; and validated the previously made technical corrections in the section designation of § 25-371.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6(c) of Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-108, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7622).